District of Columbia statutes.
22-2716

Violation of injunction granted under § 22-2714.

In case of the violation of any injunction granted under the provisions of § 22-2714, the court, or, in vacation, a judge thereof, may summarily try and punish the offender. The proceedings shall be commenced by filing with the clerk of the court an information, under oath, setting out the alleged facts constituting such violation, upon which the court or judge shall cause a warrant to issue, under which the defendant shall be arrested. The trial may be had upon affidavits, or either party may at any stage of the proceedings demand the production and oral examination of the witnesses. A party found guilty of contempt, under the provisions of this section, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $200 and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment in the District Jail not less than three nor more than 6 months or by both fine and imprisonment.

Feb. 7, 1914, 38 Stat. 281, ch. 16, § 4
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 230, 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 230 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “nor more than $1,000”.
1973 Ed., § 22-2716.
1981 Ed., § 22-2716.
This section is referenced in § 22-2717.